Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-311 Real property owned. (a)
An insurer other than a life insurer may own and invest, or have invested in
its home office and branch office buildings, any of its funds in an aggregate
amount not to exceed twenty per cent of its admitted assets unless approved by
the commissioner, or if a mutual or reciprocal insurer, not to exceed twenty
per cent of its admitted assets nor an amount as would reduce its surplus,
exclusive of such investment, below the minimum required surplus for the class,
or combination of classes, of insurance authorized, unless approved by the
commissioner. A life insurer may own and invest, or have invested in its home
office building and branch office buildings, any of its funds in an aggregate
amount not to exceed twenty per cent of its admitted assets, or fifty per cent
of the excess of its admitted assets over its liabilities, other than capital
stock if a stock life insurer, whichever is the lesser amount. The home office
or branch office buildings may be constructed upon leasehold estates. However,
if a life insurer has been licensed less than five years, a prior approval from
the commissioner shall be required before investment may be made in home office
or branch office buildings.

(b) An insurer may invest any of its funds, in
an aggregate amount not exceeding ten per cent of its assets, in real property
acquired for the production of income under the following terms and conditions:

(1) The investment in any single parcel of real
estate shall not exceed five per cent of its admitted assets;

(2) The investment shall produce sufficient income to
amortize any loan secured by a mortgage on the real property;

(3) If any improvements exist on or are to be
constructed on the real property for lease to lessees, the improvements shall
remain on the property during the period of the lease, with provisions when the
improvements are put upon the property at the cost of the lessee that at the
termination of the lease the ownership of the improvements, free of liens,
shall vest in the owner of the real estate; and

(4) During the term of the lease the tenant shall pay
all taxes and assessments levied on or against the real estate, including
improvements, shall keep and maintain the improvements in good repair, and
shall provide and maintain for the benefit of the lessor fire insurance on the
improvements in an amount at least equal to the insurable value of the
improvements, or at least equal to the amount invested by the lessor in the
real estate, whichever is less.

(c) An insurer may invest any of its funds, in
an aggregate amount not exceeding thirty per cent of its assets in real
property including the realty set forth in subsections (a) and (b), for realty
acquired for the purpose of leasing the same to any person for a period of not
less than twenty years, or in real property already leased for an unexpired
period of not less than fifteen years of an original period of not less than
twenty years, under the following terms and conditions:

(1) The lessee, at the lessee's own cost, shall
erect, or have already erected, thereon free of liens a building or other
improvements costing an amount at least equal to the value of the real estate
exclusive of improvements; but if the lease be entered into simultaneously with
the purchase of the real estate, the lessor may agree to erect the improvements
on the real estate;

(2) The improvements shall remain on the property
during the period of the lease, with provisions when the improvements are put
upon the property at the cost of the lessee that at the termination of the
lease the ownership of the improvements, free of liens, shall vest in the owner
of the real estate;

(3) The lessee, during the term of the lease, or the
unexpired period of the lease if the property is bought subject to the lease,
shall pay to the owner of the real estate rent in an amount as will enable the
owner to amortize the investment at or before the normal termination of the
lease, or at or before the end of fifty years should the lease, or the
unexpired period of the lease, be for a longer period than fifty years; and

(4) During the term of the lease the tenant shall pay
all taxes and assessments levied on or against the real estate, including
improvements, shall keep and maintain the improvements in good repair, and
shall provide and maintain for the benefit of the lessor fire insurance on the
improvements in an amount at least equal to the insurable value of the
improvements, or at least equal to the amount invested by the lessor in the
real estate, whichever is less.

(d) Real property acquired pursuant to
subsection (c) shall not be treated as an investment unless and until the
required improvements have been constructed and the lease agreement entered
into, and the amount to which the real property shall be treated as an
investment shall not exceed the amount actually invested reduced each year in
the amounts as will suffice to amortize completely the investment at the normal
termination of the lease or at the end of fifty years should the term of the
lease, or the unexpired period of the lease, be for a longer period than fifty
years.

(e) An insurer may own real property acquired
in satisfaction or on account of loans, mortgages, liens, judgments, or other
debts previously owing to the insurer in the course of its business, and may
invest or have invested in an aggregate amount not exceeding three per cent of
its assets in other real property, and in the repair, alteration, furnishing,
or improvement thereof, as follows only:

(1) Other real property requisite for its
accommodation in the convenient transaction of its business if approved by the
commissioner;

(2) Real property acquired by gift or devise;

(3) Real property acquired in exchange for real
property owned by it. If necessary in order to consummate an exchange, the
insurer may put up cash in an amount not to exceed twenty per cent of the fair
value of its real property to be so exchanged, in addition to the property;

(4) Real property acquired through a lawful merger or
consolidation with it of another insurer and not required for the purposes
specified in subsection (a) and subsection (c)(1); or

(5) Upon approval of the commissioner, in real
property and equipment incident to real property, requisite or desirable for
the protection or enhancement of the value of other real property owned by the
insurer. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as superseded by c 348, §13; am L 1996, c 65,
§1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next